Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. Gasoline Tax
§ 39-17-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month:

When gasoline is purchased in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed supplier, the supplier shall report to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed in the state during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due under this article;

When gasoline is purchased out of Wyoming for use, sale or distribution in Wyoming, the Wyoming licensed supplier shall report to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due under this article;

When gasoline is purchased in Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed refiner, the refiner shall report to the department all gallons used, sold or distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due under this article;

A Wyoming licensed importer shall report to the department all gallons imported during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this article unless the tax has been paid to an out-of-state licensed supplier;

Any person acquiring ethanol or other blending components to blend with gasoline shall report to the department all gallons of ethanol or other blending components purchased and blended during the preceding calendar month and remit all additional taxes due on the ethanol or blending components.

Each person transporting, conveying or bringing gasoline into this state for sale, use or distribution in this state shall furnish the department a verified statement showing the number of gallons of gasoline delivered during the month preceding the report, the name of the person to whom the delivery was made and the place of delivery;

Each person who exports gasoline from this state shall report the number of gallons exported, the destination state and the name of the person to whom exported;

On or before the last day of each month:

Each dealer, who is not licensed as a distributor, shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department showing the number of billed gallons of gasoline acquired, the person who supplied the gasoline and the total gallons sold during the preceding calendar month;

Each ethanol producer, importer or exporter shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department showing the amount of ethanol produced, imported or exported for the purpose of blending with gasoline and the person who purchased the ethanol during the preceding calendar month;

Each distributor or importer shall submit a statement to the department in a format required by the department for the preceding calendar month for the purpose of obtaining a refund from the department for taxes paid pursuant to this section.

A person shall not transport motor fuel by railroad tank car or transport truck unless the person has a shipping document for its transportation that complies with this section. A shipping document issued by a terminal operator or the operator of a bulk plant shall contain the following information:

The identification, including address, of the terminal or bulk plant from which the motor fuel was received;

The date the motor fuel was removed;

The amount of motor fuel removed, indicating gross or net gallons;

The destination state of the motor fuel, as represented to the terminal operator by the transporter, the shipper or the shipper’s agent;

The name of the shipper of the gasoline within the bulk plant or terminal;

The consignee’s name and address;

The transporter’s name;

Any other information required by the department for the enforcement of this article.

A person to whom a shipping document was issued shall:

Carry the shipping document in the conveyance for which it was issued when transporting the motor fuel described in it;

Show the shipping document to a law enforcement officer or authorized personnel of the department upon request;

Deliver the motor fuel described in the shipping document to the destination state printed on it unless the person does all of the following:

Notifies the department when transporting the motor fuel into a state other than the printed destination state that the person has received instructions for since the shipping document was issued to deliver the motor fuel to a different destination state;

Writes on the shipping document the change in destination state;

Gives a copy of the shipping document to the distributor or other person to whom the motor fuel is delivered.

A person to whom motor fuel is delivered by railroad tank car or transport truck shall not accept delivery of the motor fuel if the destination state shown on the shipping document for the motor fuel is a state other than Wyoming. The person to whom the fuel is delivered shall examine the shipping document and keep a copy of the shipping document;

Each supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter, distributor and dealer shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase and sale of gasoline for three (3) years. The department may, by rule and regulation, authorize alternate methods of preserving the records required under this section;

Each person transporting, conveying or importing gasoline into the state or producing, refining, manufacturing, blending or compounding and using, selling or distributing gasoline for sale or use in this state shall keep and preserve the records relating to the purchase or sale of gasoline for three (3) years;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, each carrier licensed under the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement shall file, in a format required by the department, a report indicating the total number of miles traveled in all jurisdictions by the operator’s vehicles subject to the tax under this article, the total number of miles traveled by those vehicles in this state, the amount of gasoline used by those vehicles in all jurisdictions, the amount of tax under this article paid during the calendar quarter and any other information required by the department to compute the licensee’s tax liability. The licensee shall pay all taxes due under this article at the time the report is filed. If the tax on gasoline imported in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Wyoming highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis, the department may approve and adopt that basis. In the absence of mileage records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of gasoline consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gallon of gasoline was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled.

Payment. The following shall apply:

On or before the last day of each month every supplier, refiner, terminal operator and importer shall pay to the department all license taxes imposed by this article which are due based upon the statement submitted under W.S. 39-17-107(a)(i)(A). Payment may be made by electronic funds transfer;

The supplier, refiner or importer shall not require payment from the distributor of the license taxes imposed under this article until three (3) business days prior to the date which the taxes are required to be remitted to the state by the supplier, refiner or importer. A licensed distributor may elect to make delayed payments to a licensed supplier, refiner or importer, provided:

If the supplier, refiner or importer has an electronic funds transfer program in operation, the payment is made by electronic funds transfer;

The distributor continues to make timely payments to the supplier, refiner or importer.

A distributor or importer who owns a bulk plant in this state may take a shrinkage credit of one percent (1%) on gross gallons of bulk gasoline purchased directly from a terminal and delivered in this state for use, sale or distribution. This credit may be claimed on the monthly tax return. A distributor or importer who does not own a bulk plant, but owns retail locations and distributes gasoline to those locations only shall be entitled to the shrinkage credit on gross gallons of bulk gasoline delivered.

Timelines. The following shall apply:

Any report, claims, tax return, statement or other document or payments required or authorized by this article to be made or filed to or with the department and which is:

Transmitted through the United States mail is deemed filed and received by the department on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped on the envelope or other appropriate wrapper containing it;

Mailed but not received by the department or where received but the cancellation mark is illegible, erroneous or omitted, is deemed filed and received on the date mailed if the sender establishes it was deposited in the mail on or before the due date for filing and submits a duplicate within thirty (30) days following written notification by the department of the nonreceipt;

Received through electronic funds transfer is deemed to have been received when the electronic funds transfer transmission is received by the department;

Received through electronic data interchange is deemed to have been received when the electronic data interchange transmission is received by the department.

Any tax return or license application that is not signed and any tax return which does not contain all pertinent information is considered not filed until the licensee signs or supplies the required information to the department. If the information required in the documents is presented to the department in a format other than that prescribed or otherwise approved by the department, the tax return, application or claim for refund or credit shall be deemed not filed. The licensee shall have ten (10) days to provide the information requested in a manner prescribed or otherwise approved by the department. If the licensee provides the information requested by the department within ten (10) days, the tax return or license application shall be deemed to have been timely filed;

Evidence that correspondence mailed from the department to the last known address of a person shall be deemed prima facie evidence that the person received the correspondence after five (5) business days have elapsed from the date the correspondence was mailed. As used in this section, “last known address” means the most current address on file with the department.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to define the reporting format requirement for all licensees.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 1-3; 1999, ch. 161, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2011, ch. 99, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), deleted “business” preceding “day” in (i) and (iv); deleted last sentence in (ii) which related to the time limit for forms to be returned to the department; deleted “or exported” following “importer in (iv)(C); in (xi), deleted “calendar” following “last day of the,” deleted “signed by the operator” preceding “indicating the total”; added (d); and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iv)(C), deleted “which may include the amount of bulk delivery tax credits granted under W.S. 39-17-105(c)” after “by the department.”

Editor's notes. —

Paragraph (a)(xi) of this section was originally designated as subsection (c) of W.S. 39-6-217, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, and was subsequently redesignated by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-204, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-204 by ch. 51, § 2, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, amended W.S. 39-6-206 and 39-6-208, which were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-206 and 39-6-208 by ch. 51, § 2, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3, amended W.S. 39-6-207, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-207 by ch. 51, § 3, was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-108.
Enforcement.

Audits. All tax returns and records are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies.

Interest. The license taxes and penalty shall be collected by the department together with interest of one percent (1%) per month on the license taxes from the due date until payment.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

Any person who conducts the business of a supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer, exporter or dealer without holding a valid license as specified in W.S.

39-17-106

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Each day in violation of the provisions of this section constitutes a separate offense;

If any person fails or refuses to file the monthly statement and remit the tax as provided by W.S. 39-17-107(a)(i), the department shall make a statement for that person from the best information available and from such statement shall determine the amount of license taxes required to be paid and add thereto a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the taxes due. The department shall notify the delinquent taxpayer of the total amount due by serving written notice upon such person personally or by United States mail to the last known address as shown on the records of the department. If the delinquent taxpayer proves to the department that the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause, the department shall waive the penalty provided in this paragraph. If the delinquent taxpayer after receiving the statement prepared by the department later renders to the department a true statement covering the same calendar month, the department shall use such statement, adding the penalty of ten percent (10%) and interest of one percent (1%) per month on the license taxes from the due date until payment. The penalty shall be waived by the department upon satisfactory written proof the delinquency was due to a reasonable cause;

Any person who fails to furnish any report or remit any license tax to the department as required by this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each offense is punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. In addition, the department may suspend or revoke any license held by the offender and may require the offender, as a condition of any future licensing under this article, to provide a surety bond, cash bond or certificate of deposit as provided by W.S.

39-17-106

(e);

Any supplier, refiner, terminal operator, importer, exporter or distributor selling gasoline subject to the license taxes imposed by this article while delinquent in the payment of any such taxes is liable for double the amount due to be recovered in a suit instituted by and in the name of the state of Wyoming. Upon application made by the state a writ of injunction may be issued, without requiring bond, against the defendants enjoining and restraining them from selling or offering to sell in the state gasoline until the license taxes are paid. Upon application made by the state a receiver of the property and business of the defendant may be appointed to impound the same as security for the delinquent tax and any judgment recovered in the suit;

The department may revoke any license granted upon proof of violation of any provision of this article;

Any person who does not display the price per gallon including all applicable taxes at which gasoline is to be sold as provided by W.S. 39-17-103(c)(i) and (ii) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection;

Any person violating any provision of this article, or who procures, aids or abets any person in a violation or noncompliance is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or both;

The Wyoming highway patrol and all peace officers of any county or municipality shall aid in the enforcement of this article.

Liens. There are no specific applicable provisions for liens for this article.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 72, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(iii), inserted “cash bond or certificate of deposit.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S.

39-6-213

, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 51 to §

39-6-213

were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this article.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department concerning the assessment of fuel taxes may appeal to the state board of equalization. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board of equalization by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds for the appeal;

The department shall, in a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken;

Any person, including the department, aggrieved by any order issued by the state board of equalization may appeal the decision of the board to the first judicial district court in Laramie county;

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person aggrieved by the payment of taxes or any penalty or interest imposed by this article shall appeal a decision of the state board until all applicable taxes, penalties and interest have been paid.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

Gasoline or gasohol purchased from a Wyoming licensed distributor or dealer by the University of Wyoming and community colleges and public schools located in Wyoming is subject to refund of the license tax. The record of purchases under this paragraph shall be submitted monthly by the purchaser on refund forms provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing gallons purchased and license taxes paid. The refund form and receipts are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

On or before the last day of each month every distributor shall submit a statement to the department on forms furnished by or in a format required by the department for the preceding calendar month for the purpose of obtaining a refund from the department for taxes paid pursuant to W.S. 39-17-107(a)(i);

Any person exporting gasoline from Wyoming for which the license tax has been paid is subject to a refund of the license tax paid. The refund request shall be submitted on or before the last day of the month on forms provided by or in a format required by the department. The refund request is invalid if not submitted within one (1) year of the date of purchase;

Gasoline purchased for agricultural purposes as defined in W.S. 39-17-101(a)(i) is qualified for a refund of the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(i) and (ii) as declared by the applicant. Any person claiming a refund of the agricultural gas tax for which the license tax has been paid shall submit a record of purchases and shall specify the percentage of such purchases qualifying for the refund on a form provided by or in a format required by the department, along with receipts detailing the bulk gallons purchased and license taxes paid. The department shall establish by rule a form or the format for applying for the refund under this subsection. The refund form and receipts shall be invalid if not submitted to the department within eighteen (18) months following the date of purchase. Not to exceed sixty (60) days following submission of the information required by this paragraph, the department shall issue a refund of the qualified gasoline license tax.

Credits. The following shall apply:

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 105, § 1.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for escrow for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 186, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2011, ch. 99, § 1; ch. 170, § 1; 2012, ch. 105, § 1; 2014 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c) and (d)(i), inserted “or in a format required by”; and deleted “business” following “the last” in (v).

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “January 1 of each year” for “January 1, 2002” in (d)(v).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 99 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (c)(iv), deleted “which may include the amount of bulk delivery tax credits granted under W.S. 39-17-105(c) after “by the department”; and added (c)(vi).

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 170 § 1, inserted “and prior to July 1, 2011” in (d)(iv)(C) and (d)(iv)(E).

Laws 2011, ch. 170 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Amendment effective July 1, 2015. —

Laws 2012, ch. 105, § 1, repealed former (d)(i) through (vi) pertaining to the gasoline tax credit provided to producers of ethanol.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “eighteen (18) months” for “one (1) year” in the next-to-last sentence of (c)(vi).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The following shall apply” for “There are no specific applicable provisions for appeals for this article”; and added (b)(i) through (b)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, §§ 2 and 3, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-209, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments by ch. 51 to § 39-6-209 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, amended W.S. 39-6-216, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 51 to § 39-6-216 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2012, ch. 105, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding the repeal under section 1 of this act, credits granted pursuant to W.S. 39-17-109(d) prior to the effective date of this act shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from the date of issue by the department of transportation.”

§ 39-17-110.
Statute of limitations.

The refund form and receipts, as provided for in W.S. 39-17-109(c)(ii) are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of purchase.

The record and sales slip shall be preserved by each refiner or distributor and each purchaser for three (3) years.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-111.
Distribution.

All gasoline license taxes and fees received under this article shall be credited to the proper accounts as specified by the department and in subsection (d) of this section.

The department shall deposit all license fees under W.S.

39-17-106

into the state highway fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.

The department shall credit to appropriate accounts based upon deductions from the taxes collected under this article in the following order:

Deduct the pro rata share of the cost of collecting the taxes received from gasoline used for aircraft at any municipal or county airport and distribute the remainder to the city, town or county where the airport is located. These funds shall be used for the maintenance of the airport;

Deduct an amount collected on fuel used in snowmobiles, computed by multiplying the number of snowmobiles for which registration and user fees have been paid during the current fiscal year under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(i) and 31-2-409(a)(ii) times twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75) plus the number of gallons of gasoline used by snowmobiles for which registration fees have been paid during the current fiscal year under W.S. 31-2-404(a)(ii) times the current gasoline tax rate as defined by W.S. 39-17-104(a)(i). The number of gallons used by commercial snowmobiles shall be reported to the department by all businesses offering commercial snowmobile recreational leasing. The amounts computed shall be credited to a separate account to be expended by the department of state parks and cultural resources to improve snowmobile trails in Wyoming;

Deduct an amount collected on fuel used in motorboats, computed by multiplying the number of motorboats numbered during the current fiscal year under W.S.

41-13-102

plus the number of nonresident motorboats for which aquatic invasive species fees have been paid during the immediately preceding fiscal year in accordance with W.S.

23-4-204

times twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75). The amount computed shall be credited to a separate account to be expended by the department of state parks and cultural resources to improve, construct, maintain, operate and ensure the safety of facilities for use by motorboats and motorboat users at state parks and state recreation areas and to provide grants to governmental entities for improvement, construction, maintenance, operation and ensuring the safety of publicly owned boating facilities at public parks and recreational facilities;

Deduct an amount collected on fuel used in off-road recreational vehicles, computed by multiplying the number of off-road recreational vehicles for which user registration fees have been paid during the current fiscal year under W.S. 31-2-703(a) times eighteen dollars and forty cents ($18.40). The amount computed shall be credited to a separate account to be expended by the department of state parks and cultural resources to improve off-road recreational vehicle trails in Wyoming.

After crediting the amounts provided by subsection (c) of this section, the department shall deposit the balance of taxes collected under this article into the accounts within the state highway fund created under this subsection, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, as follows:

Thirteen and one-half percent (13.5%) shall be distributed monthly to county treasurers. Each county treasurer shall credit such revenues to the county road fund for the improvement and maintenance of county roads. The distribution to each county shall be based on:

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the rural population including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state;

One-third (1/3) in the ratio in which the assessed valuation of the county bears to the last total assessed valuation of the state.

Fourteen percent (14%) shall be credited to the county treasurers of the various counties for their road construction funds, except that an amount equal to the contribution required of the counties for the cost of the university’s technology transfer program under W.S. 21-17-115(a)(ii) or thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00), whichever is less shall be first distributed to the highway fund, plus an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) per year shall first be distributed to the highway fund for the University of Wyoming technology transfer program’s county road inventory program. Each county treasurer shall credit the revenues to the road construction fund in that county. The department shall allocate to each county a share based fifty percent (50%) upon the ratio which the rural population of each county including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) bears to the total rural population of the state and fifty percent (50%) based on the ratio which the area of the county bears to the total area of the state. Any interest earned on invested funds allocated to counties shall be retained by each county and shall be used for project costs as provided by W.S. 24-2-110(a);

Fifteen percent (15%) shall be distributed as follows:

To the highway fund, an amount equal to the contribution required of the cities and town for the cost of the university’s technology transfer program under W.S. 21-17-115(a)(iii) or thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00), whichever is less;

The remainder to be distributed monthly to incorporated cities and towns to be used in their street and alley programs as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) based on the taxes paid upon gasoline sold to and distributed by dealers located within each incorporated city and town;

Twenty-five percent (25%) in the ratio which the population of each city or town bears to the total population of all cities and towns.

Fifty-seven and one-half percent (57.5%) to the state highway account. Any funds deposited to the highway fund under this paragraph which are attributable to the increase in fuel taxes authorized by 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 49, Section 1 and effective July 1, 2013 shall be separately accounted for by the department of transportation. The department shall provide a comprehensive report on revenue and expenditures attributable to the 2013 increase to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee on or before November 15 of each year, from the effective date of this act through November 15, 2020.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2.

All taxes collected under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii) shall be deposited into the state highway fund with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii). Any refund for any overpayment of this one cent ($.01) tax shall be taken from the taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii).

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 105, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1, ch. 56, § 1, ch. 108, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; ch. 74, § 1; ch. 139, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; ch. 126, § 1; 2005, ch. 105, § 2; ch. 149, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 28, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 159, § 1, effective March 9, 2015; 2017 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (c)(ii), inserted “gallons of gasoline used by,” substituted “the current gasoline tax rate as defined by W.S. 39-17-104(a)(i)” for “thirty-two dollars and fifty cents ($32.50),” added the second sentence, and made a stylistic change.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, repealed former subsection (h), limiting a county's use of its unobligated share of the prior year's contribution to the road construction fund for the improvement and maintenance of county roads and bridges to not more than fifty percent (50%) or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), whichever is less.

The third 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (c)(ii), (c)(iii), and (c)(iv), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund”.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by all three 2005 acts.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, deleted “Until June 30, 2008,” at the beginning of (c)(iii), substituted “2013” for “2008” in (c)(iv).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “according to the last federal census” from the end of (d)(i)(B); deleted “according to the last federal census” following “population of the state” in the second to the last sentence of
(d)(ii); deleted “according to the last federal census” from the end of (d)(iii)(B)(II); and repealed (e), which read: “As used in subsection (d) of this section, ‘last federal census’ means the last official federal census conducted by the bureau of the census to become effective on July 1 next following the receipt of the official census figures.”

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 22 § 1, deleted “Until June 30, 2013” at the beginning of (c)(iv).

Laws 2013, ch. 22, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 49 § 1, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75)” for “sixteen dollars and twenty-five cents ($16.25)” following “31-2-409(a)(ii) times” in (c)(ii); substituted “twenty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($28.75)” for “sixteen dollars and twenty-five cents ($16.25)” following “nonresident motorboats times” in (c)(iii); and substituted substituted “eighteen dollars and forty cents ($18.40)” for “ten dollars and forty cents ($10.40)” following “31-2-703(a) times” in (c)(iv).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “The following shall apply” for “There are no specific applicable provisions for appeals for this article”; and added (b)(i) through (b)(iv).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(iii), substituted “plus the number of nonresident motorboats for which aquatic invasive species fees have been paid during the immediately preceding fiscal year in accordance with
W.S.

23-4-204

” for “and five thousand (5,000) nonresident motorboats.”

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (c)(iii), substituted “improve, construct, maintain, operate and ensure the safety of facilities” for “improve facilities” and “improvement, construction, maintenance, operation and ensuring the safety of publicly owned” for “improvement of publicly owned” in the second sentence.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (f) deleted “and W.S. 39-17-105(c)” following “this section.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 49, § 2, directs:
“(a) Until June 30, 2014, any funds deposited
to the highway fund
which are attributable to the increase in fuel
taxes under this act
shall be separately accounted for by the department
of transportation
and shall only be expended to:

“(i) Maintain
the state highway system in the condition existing
as of the effective
date of this act; and

“(ii) Prepare
the report required by subsection (c) of this section.

“(b) Any funds
deposited to the highway fund which are attributable
to the increase
in fuel taxes under this act shall supplement and
shall not supplant
funds currently budgeted by the transportation
commission for purposes
of maintaining the state highway system in
the 2013-2014 fiscal biennium.

“(c) The department
of transportation shall provide a comprehensive
report to the joint
appropriations interim committee and joint transportation,
highways
and military affairs interim committee on or before November
1, 2013
on the condition of the state highway system and projected
revenue
requirements to maintain the current condition of the state
highway
system.”

Laws 1998, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-210, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-210 by ch. 56, § 1, was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Legislature did not contemplate the taking of any special censuses. —

The legislature, when it enacted the acts constituting this section, did not have in mind any special censuses to be taken by any cities or towns in the state. State ex rel. City of Casper v. Morgan, 80 Wyo. 1, 336 P.2d 791,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1959).

Special census has no effect on distribution of gasoline taxes. —

There can be no objection to a special census having a controlling effect as to any internal affairs of a city, but it can have no effect on the distribution of the gasoline taxes. State ex rel. City of Casper v. Morgan, 80 Wyo. 1, 336 P.2d 791,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1959).